Massachusetts, session 194th, H2118.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24L of Chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 104 and 105, the words “provided
that such consideration is specified in the noncompetition agreement” and inserting in place
thereof the following: - “provided that such agreement is reasonably related to the requirements
of the garden leave clause as set out in Section (i) of this subsection and provided further that
such consideration is specified in the noncompetition agreement.”
of 1